Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.533

Resignation of registered agent for service of process.

A registered agent for service of process of a limited liability partnership may resign as agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation in accordance with RCW 23.95.445.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5111; 2009 c 437 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.